California statutes. Labor Code
 employer, except as provided in subdivisions (g) and (h), shall not subject, or threaten to subject, an employee to discharge, discrimination, retaliation, or any other adverse action because the employee declines to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or affirmatively declines to participate in, receive, or listen to any communications with the employer or its agents or representatives, the purpose of which is to communicate the employer’s opinion about religious or political matters. An employee who is working at the time of the meeting and elects not to attend a meeting described in this subdivision shall continue to be paid while the meeting is held.

(d) In addition to any other remedy, an employer who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) per employee for each violation.

(e) The Labor Commissioner may enforce this section, including investigating an alleged violation, and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate a violation or maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing through the procedures set forth in Section 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including issuing a citation against an employer who violates this section and filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set
 out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as applicable.

(f) (1) Alternatively to subdivision (e), any employee who
 has suffered a violation of subdivision (c) may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction for damages caused by that adverse action, including punitive
 damages.

(2) In any civil action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), an employee or their exclusive representative may petition the superior court in any county wherein the violation in question is alleged to have occurred, or wherein the person resides or transacts business, for appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief.

(g) This section does not prohibit any of the following:

(1) An employer from communicating to its employees any
 information that the employer is required by law to communicate, but only to the extent of that legal requirement.

(2) An employer from communicating to its employees any information that is necessary for those employees to perform their job duties.

(3) An institution of higher education, or any agent, representative, or designee of that institution, from meeting with or participating in any communications with its employees that are part of coursework, any symposia, or an academic program at that institution.

(4) An employer that is a public entity from communicating to its employees any information related to a policy of the public entity or any law or
 regulation that the public entity is responsible for administering.

(h) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A religious corporation, entity, association, educational institution, or society that is exempt from the requirements of Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352) pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 2000e-1(a) or is exempt from employment discrimination protections of state law, including, but not limited to, subdivision (d) of Section 12926 of the Government Code, except as
 provided in Section 12926.2 of the Government Code, and subdivision (d) of Section 98.6 of the Labor Code, with respect to speech on religious matters to employees who perform work connected with the activities undertaken by that religious corporation, entity, association, educational institution, or society.

(2) A political organization or party requiring its employees to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in any communications with the employer or its agents or representatives, the purpose of which is to communicate the employer’s political tenets or purposes.

(3) An educational institution requiring a student or instructor to attend lectures on political or religious matters that are part of the regular coursework at the institution.

(4) A nonprofit, tax-exempt training program requiring a student or instructor to attend classroom instruction, complete fieldwork, or perform community service hours on political or religious matters as it relates to the mission of the training program or sponsor.

(5) An employer requiring employees to undergo training to comply with the employer’s legal obligations, including obligations under civil rights laws and occupational safety and health laws.

(6) A public employer holding a new employee orientation, as defined in Section 3555.5 of the Government Code, or a provider holding an orientation as described in Section 12301.24 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(i) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   (SB 399)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Unlawful Acts During Labor Disputes [1138. - 1138.5.]

1138.

No officer or member of any association or organization, and no association or organization, participating or interested in a labor dispute, shall be held responsible or liable in any court of this state for the unlawful acts of individual officers, members, or agents, except upon clear proof of actual participation in, or actual authorization of those acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.1.

(a) No court of this state shall have authority to issue a temporary or permanent injunction in any case involving or growing out of a labor dispute, except after hearing the testimony of witnesses in open court, with opportunity for cross-examination, in support of the allegations of a complaint made under oath, and testimony in opposition thereto, if offered, and except after findings of fact by the court, of all of the following:

(1) That unlawful acts have been threatened and will be committed unless restrained or have been committed and will be continued unless restrained, but no injunction or temporary restraining order shall be issued on account of any threat or unlawful act excepting against the person or persons, association, or organization making the threat or committing the unlawful act or actually authorized those acts.

(2) That substantial and irreparable injury to complainant’s property will follow.

(3) That as to each item of relief granted greater injury will be inflicted upon complainant by the denial of relief than will be inflicted upon defendants by the granting of relief.

(4) That complainant has no adequate remedy at law.

(5) That the public officers charged with the duty to protect complainant’s property are unable or unwilling to furnish adequate protection.

(b) The hearing shall be held after due and personal notice thereof has been given, in the manner that the court shall direct, to all known persons against whom relief is sought, and also to the chief of those public officials of the county and city within which the unlawful acts have been threatened or committed charged with the duty to protect complainant’s property. However, if a complainant also alleges that, unless a temporary restraining order is issued without notice, a substantial and irreparable injury to complainant’s property will be unavoidable, such a temporary restraining order may be issued upon testimony under oath, sufficient, if sustained, to justify the court in issuing a temporary injunction upon a hearing after notice. Such a temporary restraining order shall be effective for no longer than five days and shall become void at the expiration of those five days. No temporary restraining order shall be issued unless the judicial officer issuing the temporary restraining order first hears oral argument from the opposing party or opposing party’s attorney, except in the instances specified in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure. No temporary restraining order or temporary injunction shall be issued except on the condition that the complainant first files an undertaking with adequate security in an amount to be fixed by the court sufficient to recompense those enjoined for any loss, expense, or damage caused by the improvident or erroneous issuance of the order or injunction, including all reasonable costs, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee, and expense of defense against the order or against the granting of any injunctive relief sought in the same proceeding and subsequently denied by the court.

(c) The undertaking shall be an agreement entered into by the complainant and the surety upon which a decree may be rendered in the same suit or proceeding against the complainant and surety, upon a hearing to assess damages of which hearing the complainant and surety shall have reasonable notice, the complainant and surety submitting themselves to the jurisdiction of the court for that purpose. Nothing contained in this section shall deprive any party having a claim or cause of action under or upon such undertaking from electing to pursue his or her ordinary remedy by suit at law or in equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.2.

No restraining order or injunctive relief shall be granted to any complainant involved in the labor dispute in question who has failed to comply with any obligation imposed by law, or who has failed to make every reasonable effort to settle that dispute either by negotiation or with the aid of any available governmental machinery of mediation or voluntary arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.3.

No restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction shall be granted in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute, except on the basis of findings of fact made and filed by the court in the record of the case prior to the issuance of the restraining order or injunction; and every restraining order or injunction granted in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute shall include only a prohibition of the specific act or acts as may be expressly complained of in the complaint or petition filed in such case and as shall be expressly included in findings of fact made and filed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.4.

The term “labor dispute” as used in this chapter has the same meaning as set forth in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 527.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.5.

Sections 1138.1, 1138.2, and 1138.3 shall not apply to any peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Workers’ Rights in Emergencies [1139. - 1139.]

1139.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(1) (A) “Emergency condition” means the existence of either of the following:

(i) Conditions of disaster or extreme peril to the safety of persons or property at the workplace or worksite caused by natural forces or a criminal act. 

(ii) An order to evacuate a workplace, a worksite,
 a worker’s home, or the school of a worker’s child due to natural disaster or a criminal act.

(B) “Emergency condition” does not include a health pandemic.

(2) “A reasonable belief that the workplace or worksite is unsafe” means that a reasonable person, under the circumstances
 known to the employee at the time, would conclude there is a real danger of death or serious injury if that person enters or remains on the premises. The existence of any health and safety regulations specific to the emergency condition and an employer’s compliance or noncompliance with those regulations shall be a relevant factor if this information is known to the employee at the time of the emergency condition or the employee received training on the health and safety regulations mandated by law specific to the emergency condition.

(b) In the event of an emergency condition, an employer shall not do either of the following:

(1) Take or threaten adverse action against any employee for refusing to report to, or
 leaving, a workplace or worksite
 within the affected area because the employee has a reasonable belief that the workplace or worksite is unsafe. This paragraph does not apply to the following:

(A) A first responder, as defined in Section 8562 of the Government Code.

(B) A disaster service worker, as defined in Section 3101 of the Government Code.

(C) An employee required by law to render aid or remain on the premises in case of an emergency.

(D) An employee or contractor of a health care facility who provides
 direct patient care, provides services supporting patient care operations during an emergency, or is required by law or policy to participate in emergency response or evacuation.

(E) An employee of a private entity that contracts with the state or any city, county, or political subdivision of the state, including a special district, for purposes of providing or aiding in emergency services.

(F) An employee working on a military base or in the defense industrial base sector.

(G) An employee performing essential work on nuclear reactors or
 nuclear materials or waste.

(H) An employee of a company providing utility, communications, energy, or roadside assistance while the employee is actively engaged in or is being called upon to aid in emergency response, including maintaining public access to services such as energy and water during the emergency.

(I) An employee of a licensed residential care facility.

(J) An employee of a depository institution, as defined in Section 1420 of the Financial Code.

(K) A transportation
 employee participating directly in emergency evacuations during an active evacuation.

(L) An employee of a privately contracted private fire prevention resource, that is subject to the regulations developed pursuant to Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 14865) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code and operating as a qualified insurance resource. “Qualified insurance resource” means personnel and equipment working for, or contracted by, an insurance company with a mission to mitigate risk to insured structures and operating in compliance with instruction and oversight of the incident management team of the authority having jurisdiction.

(M) An employee whose primary duties include assisting members of the public to
 evacuate in case of an emergency.

(2) (A) Prevent any employee from accessing the employee’s mobile device or other communications device for seeking emergency assistance, assessing the safety of the situation, or communicating with a person to verify their safety.

(B) In addition to employees of private entities, this paragraph applies to any employee of the state or any city, county, or political subdivision of the state, including a special district.

(C) This paragraph shall not apply to the following:

(i) An employee of a depository institution as defined in Section
 1420 of the Financial Code.

(ii) An employee of any correctional facility.

(iii) An employee who is actively operating equipment permitted under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7340) of Part 3 of Division 5, Part 8 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 5, and Part 8.1 (commencing with Section 7920) of Division 5.

(c) (1) When feasible, an employee shall notify the employer of the emergency condition requiring the employee to leave or refuse to report to the workplace or worksite prior to leaving or refusing to report.

(2) When prior notice described by paragraph (1) is not feasible, the employee shall notify the employer of the emergency condition that required the employee to leave or refuse to report to the workplace or worksite after leaving or refusing to report as soon as possible.

(d) This section is not intended to apply when
 emergency conditions that pose an imminent and ongoing risk of harm to the workplace, the worksite,
 the worker, or the worker’s home have ceased.

(e) In any action by a current or former employee that could be brought pursuant to the Labor Code Private Attorneys General Act of 2004 (Part 13 (commencing with Section 2698)) for violations of this chapter, the employer shall have the right to cure alleged violations as set forth in Section 2699.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   (SB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. AGRICULTURAL LABOR RELATIONS [1140. - 1166.3.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [1140. - 1140.6.]

1140.

This part shall be known and may be referred to as the Alatorre-Zenovich-Dunlap-Berman Agricultural Labor Relations Act of 1975.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.2.

It is hereby stated to be the policy of the State of California to encourage and protect the right of agricultural employees to full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of their own choosing, to negotiate the terms and conditions of their employment, and to be free from the interference, restraint, or coercion of employers of labor, or their agents, in the designation of such representatives or in self-organization or in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection. For this purpose this part is adopted to provide for collective-bargaining rights for agricultural employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.4.

As used in this part:

(a) The term “agriculture” includes farming in all its branches, and, among other things, includes the cultivation and tillage of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or horticultural commodities (including commodities defined as agricultural commodities in Section 1141j(g) of Title 12 of the United States Code), the raising of livestock, bees, furbearing animals, or poultry, and any practices (including any forestry or lumbering operations) performed by a farmer or on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with such farming operations, including preparation for market and delivery to storage or to market or to carriers for transportation to market.

(b) The term “agricultural employee” or “employee” shall mean one engaged in agriculture, as such term is defined in subdivision (a). However, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to include any person other than those employees excluded from the coverage of the National Labor Relations Act, as amended, as agricultural employees, pursuant to Section 2(3) of the Labor Management Relations Act (Section 152(3), Title 29, United States Code), and Section 3(f) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (Section 203(f), Title 29, United States Code).

Further, nothing in this part shall apply, or be construed to apply, to any employee who performs work to be done at the site of the construction, alteration, painting, or repair of a building, structure, or other work (as these terms have been construed under Section 8(e) of the Labor Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 158(e)) or logging or timber-clearing operations in initial preparation of land for farming, or who does land leveling or only land surveying for any of the above.

As used in this subdivision, “land leveling” shall include only major land moving operations changing the contour of the land, but shall not include annual or seasonal tillage or preparation of land for cultivation.

(c) The term “agricultural employer” shall be liberally construed to include any person acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an agricultural employee, any individual grower, corporate grower, cooperative grower, harvesting association, hiring association, land management group, any association of persons or cooperatives engaged in agriculture, and shall include any person who owns or leases or manages land used for agricultural purposes, but shall exclude any person supplying agricultural workers to an employer, any farm labor contractor as defined by Section 1682, and any person functioning in the capacity of a labor contractor. The employer engaging such labor contractor or person shall be deemed the employer for all purposes under this part.

(d) The term “person” shall mean one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, legal representatives, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, or any other legal entity, employer, or labor organization having an interest in the outcome of a proceeding under this part.

(e) The term “representatives” includes any individual or labor organization.

(f) The term “labor organization” means any organization of any kind, or any agency or employee representation committee or plan, in which employees participate and which exists, in whole or in part, for the purpose of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work for agricultural employees.

(g) The term “unfair labor practice” means any unfair labor practice specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1153) of this part.

(h) The term “labor dispute” includes any controversy concerning terms, tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.

(i) The term “board” means Agricultural Labor Relations Board.

(j) The term “supervisor” means any individual having the authority, in the interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or the responsibility to direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if, in connection with the foregoing, the exercise of such authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1140.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the board shall have exclusive jurisdiction in all phases of the administration of this part to determine whether any person or entity meets one or more definitions set forth in Section 1140.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 139, Sec. 3.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Agricultural Labor Relations Board [1141. - 1151.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Agricultural Labor Relations Board: Organization [1141. - 1150.]

1141.

(a) There is hereby created in the Labor and Workforce Development Agency the Agricultural Labor Relations Board, which shall consist of five members and which shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all phases of the administration of this part.

(b) The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The term of office of the members shall be five years, and the terms shall be staggered at one-year intervals. Upon the initial appointment, one member shall be appointed for a term ending January 1, 1977, one member shall be appointed for a term ending January 1, 1978, one member shall be appointed for a term ending January 1, 1979, one member shall be appointed for a term ending January 1, 1980, and one member shall be
 appointed for a term ending January 1, 1981. Any individual appointed to fill a vacancy of any member shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the member to whose term they are succeeding. The Governor shall designate one member to serve as chairperson of the board. Any member of the board may be removed by the Governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 139, Sec. 4.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1142.

(a) The principal office of the board shall be in Sacramento, but it may meet and exercise any or all of its power at any other place in California.

(b) Besides the principal office in Sacramento, as provided in subdivision (a), the board may establish offices in such other cities as it shall deem necessary. The board may delegate to the personnel of these offices such powers as it deems appropriate to determine the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining, to investigate and provide for hearings, to determine whether a question of representation exists, to direct an election by a secret ballot pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1156), and to certify the results of such
 election, or to certify a labor organization pursuant to Section 1156.37 and to investigate, conduct hearings and make determinations relating to unfair labor practices. The board may review any action taken pursuant to the authority delegated under this section upon a request for a review of such action filed with the board by an interested party. Any such review made by the board shall not, unless specifically ordered by the board, operate as a stay of any action taken. The entire record considered by the board in considering or acting upon any such request or review shall be made available to all parties prior to such consideration or action, and the board’s findings and action thereon shall be published as a decision of the board.

(c) This section shall
 remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1142.

(a) The principal office of the board shall be in Sacramento, but it may meet and exercise any or all of its power at any other place in California.

(b) Besides the principal office in Sacramento, as provided in subdivision (a), the board may establish offices in such other cities as it shall deem necessary. The board may delegate to the personnel of these offices such powers as it deems appropriate to determine the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining, to investigate and provide for hearings, to determine whether a question of representation exists, to direct an election by a secret ballot pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section
 1156), and to certify the results of such election, and to investigate, conduct hearings and make determinations relating to unfair labor practices. The board may review any action taken pursuant to the authority delegated under this section upon a request for a review of such action filed with the board by an interested party. Any such review made by the board shall not, unless specifically ordered by the board, operate as a stay of any action taken. The entire record considered by the board in considering or acting upon any such request or review shall be made available to all parties prior to such consideration or action, and the board’s findings and action thereon shall be published as a decision of the board.

(c) This section shall be operative January 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1142.5.

(a) The board shall maintain, at its principal office, a telephone line 24 hours a day, seven days a week, for the purpose of providing interested persons with information concerning their rights and responsibilities under this part, or for referring such persons to the appropriate agency or entity with the capacity to render advice or help in dealing with any situation arising out of agricultural labor disputes.

In order to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to this subdivision, the board may contract with an answering service to receive telephone messages during periods of time that its principal office is normally not open for business. Such messages shall be transmitted to the board on the board’s next business day, or at such earlier time as the board specifies, or to its designated representative at the earliest possible time.

(b) Whenever a petition for an election has been filed in a bargaining unit in which a majority of the employees are engaged in a strike, the necessary and appropriate services of the board in the region in which the election will be held shall be available to the parties involved 24 hours a day until the election is held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

1143.

The board shall, at the close of each fiscal year, make a report in writing to the Legislature and to the Governor stating in detail the cases it has heard, the decisions it has rendered, the names, salaries, and duties of all employees and officers in the employ or under the supervision of the board, and an account of all moneys it has disbursed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1144.

The board may from time to time make, amend, and rescind, in the manner prescribed in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

1144.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a hearing by the board under this part, except a hearing to determine an unfair labor practice charge.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 11425.30 and 11430.10 of the Government Code, in a hearing to determine an unfair labor practice charge, a person who has participated in a determination of probable cause, injunctive or other pre-hearing relief, or other equivalent preliminary determination in an adjudicative proceeding may serve as presiding officer or as a supervisor of the presiding officer or may assist or advise the presiding officer in the same proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

1145.

The board may appoint an executive secretary and such attorneys, hearing officers, administrative law officers, and other employees as it may from time to time find necessary for the proper performance of its duties. Attorneys appointed pursuant to this section may, at the discretion of the board, appear for and represent the board in any case in court. All employees appointed by the board shall perform their duties in an objective and impartial manner without prejudice toward any party subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

1146.

The board is authorized to delegate to any group of three or more board members any or all the powers which it may itself exercise. A vacancy in the board shall not impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all the powers of the board, and three members shall at all times constitute a quorum. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1147.

Each member of the board shall receive the salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 803, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

1148.

The board may follow applicable precedents of the National Labor Relations Act, as amended, which shall constitute persuasive authority in the interpretation and application of this part, but shall not be obligated to follow those precedents where the board deems it inappropriate to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 139, Sec. 5.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1149.

There shall be a general counsel of the board who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the Senate, for a term of four years. The general counsel shall have the power to appoint such attorneys, administrative assistants, and other employees as necessary for the proper exercise of his duties. The general counsel of the board shall exercise general supervision over all attorneys employed by the board (other than administrative law officers and legal assistants to board members), and over the officers and employees in the regional offices. He shall have final authority, on behalf of the board, with respect to the investigation of charges and issuance of complaints under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1160) of this part, and with respect to the prosecution of such complaints before the board. He shall have such other duties as the board may prescribe or as may be provided by law. All employees appointed by the general counsel shall perform their duties in an objective and impartial manner without prejudice toward any party subject to the jurisdiction of the board. In case of a vacancy in the office of the general counsel, the Governor is authorized to designate the officer or employee who shall act as general counsel during such vacancy, but no person or persons so designated shall so act either (1) for more than 40 days when the Legislature is in session unless a nomination to fill such vacancy shall have been submitted to the Senate, or (2) after the adjournment sine die of the session of the Senate in which such nomination was submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

1149.3.

(a) In cases that the board is required to determine the specific amount of a monetary remedy before issuing a final board order pursuant to Section 1160.3, the determination shall be completed within one year of any board order finding unfair labor practice liability and directing the payment of a monetary remedy.

(b) In cases that a determination is made concerning the amount of a monetary remedy that is continuing to accrue as described in Section 1160.3, and the board is required to determine any additional portion of the monetary remedy that has accrued after a final decision on employer liability, the board shall process to final board order a decision concerning the additional amount or amounts owed within one year of a final decision on employer liability, unless the board certifies to the parties that there is good cause for exceeding this time limit and provides a reasoned explanation for the assertion of good cause. For purposes of this subdivision, “final decision on employer liability” means the date when a board order determining the specific amount of a monetary remedy owed by a respondent found to have engaged in an unfair labor practice becomes final because no appeal was sought or the date when a reviewing court dismisses an employer’s appeal or otherwise affirms the board’s order.

(c) If an employer’s liability and compliance proceedings are consolidated, the board shall act reasonably and without delay in reaching a final decision concerning the liability and amounts owed to workers, and shall explain to the parties any good cause for delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 7, Sec. 3.   (AB 113)   Effective May 15, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1150.

Each member of the board and the general counsel of the board shall be eligible for reappointment, and shall not engage in any other business, vocation, or employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigatory Powers [1151. - 1151.6.]

1151.

For the purpose of all hearings and investigations, which, in the opinion of the board, are necessary and proper for the exercise of the powers vested in it by Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 1156) and 6 (commencing with Section 1160) of this part:

(a) The board, or its duly authorized agents or agencies, shall at all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination, and the right to copy, any evidence of any person being investigated or proceeded against that relates to any matter under investigation or in question. The members of the board or their designees or their duly authorized agents shall have the right of free access to all places of labor. The board, or any member thereof, shall upon application of any party to such proceedings, forthwith issue to such party subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of any evidence in such proceeding or investigation requested in such application. Within five days after the service of a subpoena on any person requiring the production of any evidence in his possession or under his control, such person may petition the board to revoke, and the board shall revoke, such subpoena if in its opinion the evidence whose production is required does not relate to any matter under investigation, or any matter in question in such proceedings, or if in its opinion such subpoena does not describe with sufficient particularity the evidence whose production is required. Any member of the board, or any agent or agency designated by the board for such purposes, may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence. Such attendance of witnesses and the production of such evidence may be required from any place in the state at any designated place of hearing.

(b) In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any superior court in any county within the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on, or within the jurisdiction of which such person allegedly guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, shall, upon application by the board, have jurisdiction to issue to such person an order requiring such person to appear before the board, its member, agent, or agency, there to produce evidence if so ordered, or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as a contempt thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1151.2.
